Utah statutes.
38-1a-705.   Deficiency judgment.

A claimant whose preconstruction or construction lien is not paid in full through an enforcement action as provided in this part may:

(1)  have judgment for the unpaid balance entered against the person liable; and

(2)  execute on the judgment in the same manner as execution on judgments generally.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

